District of Columbia statutes.
31-2952

Coverage for prostate cancer screening.

(a)

Each individual and group health benefits plan issued or renewed in the District of Columbia shall provide coverage for prostate cancer screening in accordance with the latest screening guidelines issued by the American Cancer Society for the ages, family histories, and frequencies referenced in such guidelines.

(b)

The coverage provided under this section shall not be more restrictive than or separate from coverage provided from any other illness, condition, or disorder for purposes of determining deductibles, benefit year or lifetime durational limits, benefit year or lifetime dollar limits, lifetime episodes or treatment limits, copayment and coinsurance factors, and benefit year maximum for deductibles and copayments and coinsurance factors.

Mar. 25, 2003, D.C. Law 14-233, § 3, 49 DCR 9772